Utah statutes.
10-15-2.   Legislative findings and purposes.
The Legislature hereby finds and declares that in certain areas in
municipalities within the state, and particularly in retail shopping areas
thereof, there is need to separate pedestrian travel from vehicular travel and
that such separation is necessary to protect the public safety or otherwise to
serve the public interest and convenience. The Legislature further finds and
declares that such objectives can, in part, be accomplished by the
establishment of pedestrian malls pursuant to this act.
